Hawaii statutes.
§349-6 State master plan for elders.
The executive office on aging shall be responsible for the continued
development, implementation, and continuous updating of a comprehensive master
plan for elders which shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(1) Compilation of basic demographic data on elders
in the State;

(2) Identification of the physical, sociological,
psychological, and economic needs of elders in the State;

(3) Establishment of immediate and long-range goals
pursuant to programs and services for elders in the State;

(4) Establishment of priorities for program
implementation and of alternatives for program implementation; and

(5) Organization of administrative and program
structure, including the use of facilities and personnel.

The state master plan for elders shall be
developed in accordance with the requirements of the executive budget act. [L
1976, c 217, pt of §2; am L 1990, c 67, §8]

Case Notes

Justifying age sixty-five retirement policy on basis of
conserving state funds would be inconsistent with this section. 56 H. 601, 546
P.2d 1005 (1976).

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next